Utah statutes.
34-20-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Affecting commerce" means in commerce, or burdening or obstructing
commerce or the free flow of commerce, or having led or tending to lead to a
labor dispute burdening or obstructing commerce or the free flow of commerce
within the state.
(2)  "Commerce" means trade, traffic, commerce, transportation, or
communication within the state.
(3)  "Election" means a proceeding in which the employees in a collective
bargaining unit cast a secret ballot for collective bargaining representatives
or for any other purpose specified in this chapter and includes elections
conducted by the board or by any tribunal having competent jurisdiction or
whose jurisdiction was accepted by the parties.
(4) (a)  "Employee" includes any employee unless this chapter explicitly
states otherwise, and includes an individual whose work has ceased as a
consequence of, or in connection with, any current labor dispute or because of
any unfair labor practice, and who has not obtained any other regular and
substantially equivalent employment.
(b)  "Employee" does not include an individual employed as an agricultural
laborer, or in the domestic service of a family or person at his home, or an
individual employed by his parent or spouse.
(5)  "Employer" includes a person acting in the interest of an employer,
directly or indirectly, but does not include:
(a)  the United States;
(b)  a state or political subdivision of a state;
(c)  a person subject to the federal Railway Labor Act;
(d)  a labor organization, other than when acting as an employer;
(e)  a corporation or association operating a hospital if no part of the net
earnings inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual; or
(f)  anyone acting in the capacity of officer or agent of a labor
organization.
(6)  "Labor dispute" means any controversy between an employer and the
majority of his employees in a collective bargaining unit concerning the right
or process or details of collective bargaining or the designation of
representatives.
(7)  "Labor organization" means an organization of any kind or any agency or
employee representation committee or plan in which employees participate that
exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of dealing with employers
concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay, hours of
employment, or conditions of work.
(8)  "Labor relations board" or "board" means the board created in Section
34-20-3.
(9)  "Person" includes an individual, partnership, association, corporation,
legal representative, trustee, trustee in bankruptcy, or receiver.
(10)  "Representative" includes an individual or labor organization.
(11)  "Secondary boycott" includes combining or conspiring to cause or
threaten to cause injury to one with whom no labor dispute exists, whether by:
(a)  withholding patronage, labor, or other beneficial business intercourse;
(b)  picketing;
(c)  refusing to handle, install, use, or work on particular materials,
equipment, or supplies; or
(d)  by any other unlawful means, in order to bring him against his will into
a concerted plan to coerce or inflict damage upon another.
(12)  "Unfair labor practice" means any unfair labor practice listed in
Section 34-20-8.
